Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Penalties

7.990.
Penalty.

Any person who fraudulently alters the engrossed copy or enrollment of any bill passed by the General Assembly, with intent to have it approved by the Governor or certified by the Secretary of State, or printed or published by the printer of the statutes, in language different from that in which it was passed by the General Assembly, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 49, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 463, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

Sentence of imprisonment for felony, see KRS

532.060

.